Ohio, session 136, SB64.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 955.54 and 959.99 be amended and section 959.23 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 955.54. (A) No person who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony offense of violence committed on or after the effective date of this section May 22, 2012, or a felony violation of any provision of Chapter 959., 2923., or 2925. of the Revised Code committed on or after the effective date of this section May 22, 2012, shall knowingly own, possess, have custody of, or reside in a residence with either of the following for a period of three years commencing either upon the date of release of the person from any period of incarceration imposed for the offense or violation or, if the person is not incarcerated for the offense or violation, upon the date of the person's final release from the other sanctions imposed for the offense or violation: (1) An unspayed or unneutered dog older than twelve weeks of age; (2) Any dog that has been determined to be a dangerous dog under Chapter 955. of the Revised Code. (B) A person described in division (A) of this section shall microchip for permanent identification any dog owned, possessed by, or in the custody of the person. (C)(1) Division (A) of this section does not apply to any person who is confined in a correctional institution of the department of rehabilitation and correction. (2) Division (A) of this section does not apply to any person with respect to any dog that the person owned, possessed, had custody of, or resided in a residence with prior to the effective date of this section May 22, 2012. Sec. 959.23. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Animal abuse offense" means a violation of Chapter 959. or section 2921.321 of the Revised Code. (2) "Companion animal" has the same meaning as in section 959.131 of the Revised Code. (B) No person who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony animal abuse offense committed on or after the effective date of this section shall knowingly own, possess, have custody of, or reside in a residence with any companion animal for a period of three years commencing either upon the date of release of the person from any period of incarceration imposed for the offense or, if the person is not incarcerated for the offense, upon the date that the person is convicted of or pleads guilty to the offense. Sec. 959.99. (A) Whoever violates section 959.18 or 959.19 of the Revised Code is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates section 959.02 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the second degree. If the value of the animal killed or the injury done amounts to three hundred dollars or more, whoever violates section 959.02 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. (C) Whoever violates section 959.01 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the second degree on a first offense and a misdemeanor of the first degree on each subsequent offense. (D) Whoever violates section 959.03, 959.06, division (C) of section 959.09, 959.12, or 959.17 or division (A) of section 959.15 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. (D)(E) Whoever violates division (A) of section 959.13 or section 959.21 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the second degree. In addition, the court may order the offender to forfeit the animal or livestock and may provide for its disposition, including, but not limited to, the sale of the animal or livestock. If an animal or livestock is forfeited and sold pursuant to this division, the proceeds from the sale first shall be applied to pay the expenses incurred with regard to the care of the animal from the time it was taken from the custody of the former owner. The balance of the proceeds from the sale, if any, shall be paid to the former owner of the animal. (E)(1) Whoever (F)(1)(a) Except as provided in division (F)(1)(b) of this section, whoever violates division (B) or (E) of section 959.131 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor felony of the first fifth degree on a first offense and and the court shall impose as a mandatory prison term the maximum prison term prescribed for a felony of the fifth degree. (b) If the offender previously has pleaded guilty to or been convicted of a violation of section 959.131 of the Revised Code, a violation of division (B) or (E) of section 959.131 is a a felony of the fifth third degree on each subsequent offenseand the court shall impose as a mandatory prison term the maximum prison term prescribed for a felony of the third degree. (2) Whoever violates division (C) or (F) of section 959.131 of the Revised Code is guilty of a felony of the fifth third degree and the court shall impose as a mandatory prison term the maximum prison term prescribed for a felony of the third degree. (3) Whoever (3)(a) Except as provided in division (F)(3)(b) of this section, whoever violates section 959.01 of the Revised Code or division (D) of section 959.131 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the second first degree on a first offense and the court shall impose as a mandatory jail term the maximum jail term prescribed for a misdemeanor of the first degree. (b) If the offender previously has pleaded guilty to or been convicted of a violation of section 959.131 of the Revised Code, a violation of division (D) of section 959.131 is a misdemeanor felony of the first fifth degree on each subsequent offenseand the court shall impose as a mandatory prison term the maximum prison term prescribed for a felony of the fifth degree. (4) Whoever violates division (F) of section 959.131 of the Revised Code is guilty of a felony of the fifth degree. (5) Whoever (4)(a) Except as provided in division (F)(4)(b) of this section, whoever violates division (G) of section 959.131 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor felony of the first fifth degree and the court shall impose as a mandatory prison term the maximum prison term prescribed for a felony of the fifth degree. (b) If the offender previously has pleaded guilty to or been convicted of a violation of section 959.131 of the Revised Code, a violation of division (G) of section 959.131 of the Revised Code is a felony of the third degree and the court shall impose as a mandatory prison term the maximum prison term prescribed for a felony of the third degree. (6)(a)(5)(a) A court may order a person who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of section 959.131 of the Revised Code to forfeit to an impounding agency, as defined in section 959.132 of the Revised Code, any or all of the companion animals in that person's ownership or care. The court also may prohibit or place limitations on the person's ability to own or care for any companion animals for a specified or indefinite period of time. (b) A court may order a person who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of division (A) of section 959.13 or section 959.131 of the Revised Code to reimburse an impounding agency for the reasonable and necessary costs incurred by the agency for the care of an animal or livestock that the agency impounded as a result of the investigation or prosecution of the violation, provided that the costs were not otherwise paid under section 959.132 of the Revised Code. (7)(6) If a court has reason to believe that a person who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of section 959.131 or 959.21 of the Revised Code has a mental or emotional disorder that contributed to the violation, the court may impose as a community control sanction or as a condition of probation a requirement that the offender undergo psychological evaluation or counseling. The court shall order the offender to pay the costs of the evaluation or counseling. (F)(G) Whoever violates section 959.14 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the second degree on a first offense and a misdemeanor of the first degree on each subsequent offense. (G)(H) Whoever violates section 959.05 or 959.20 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. (H)(I) Whoever violates section 959.16 of the Revised Code is guilty of a felony of the fourth degree for a first offense and a felony of the third degree on each subsequent offense. (I)(J) Whoever violates division (B) or (C) of section 959.15 of the Revised Code is guilty of a felony and shall be fined not more than ten thousand dollars. Section 2. That existing sections 955.54 and 959.99 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. Section 959.99 of the Revised Code is presented in this act as a composite of the section as amended by both H.B. 281 and S.B. 164 of the 134th General Assembly. The General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, finds that the composite is the resulting version of the section in effect prior to the effective date of the section as presented in this act.